District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.53

Identification.

A registered pharmacy technician shall wear a name tag bearing the title “registered pharmacy technician” and display his or her current registration in a conspicuous place in the pharmacy in which he or she is employed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 753
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this section.